public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A eriđar ariđonse eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđà/ eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàa/JLPR eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàami/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàau/Q eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàe/JL eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàelo/S eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàemi/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđài/NP eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàimo/L eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàimoi/M eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàitu/O eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàndome/G eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàndomene/G eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđào/JL eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàomi/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàrmene/G eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàsimo eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàvami/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàvau/Q eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàvelo/S eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàvemi/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàvimo/L eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàvimoi/M eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàvitu/O eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđàvomi/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđè/FP eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđème/H eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđèu/Q eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđé/FP eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéa/JLPR eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéami/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéau/Q eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđée/JL eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéelo/S eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéemi/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéi/NP eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéimo/L eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéimoi/M eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéitu/O eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđémoi/M eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéndome/G eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéndomene/G eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéo/JL eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéomi/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđésimo eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđéu/Q eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđévami/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđévau/Q eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđévelo/S eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđévemi/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđévimo/L eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđévimoi/M eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđévitu/O eriđar
SFX A eriđar ariđévomi/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar aríđelo/S eriđar
SFX A eriđar aríđeme/H eriđar
SFX A eriđar aríđemi/K eriđar
SFX A eriđar aríđitu/O eriđar
SFX A eriđar aríđomi/K eriđar
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaralo/S eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarami/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaratu/O eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarave/RT eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaremo/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaren/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧareni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarense eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaresi/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaresiu/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarion/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarioni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarionse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarisen/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧariseni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarisense eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarision/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarisioni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarisionse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarisié/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarisiéu/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarison/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarisoni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarisonse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarié/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧariéu/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaron/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaroni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaronse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarà/JLNR eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaràe/R eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarè/JL eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarèmi/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaré/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarémoi/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarésimo/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarésimoi/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaréu/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaría/JLNR eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaríami/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaríatu/O eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaríe/JLR eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaríelo/S eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaríemi/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧarò/JL eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧaròmi/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧen/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧendo/E eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧene eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧeni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧense eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧente/ eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧese/I eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧesi eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧesta/I eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧeste/I eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧesti/I eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧesto/I eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧeva/JLPR eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧeve/JL eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧevi/NP eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧevo/JL eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧida eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧide eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧidi eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧido eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧime/H eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧimo/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧindo/E eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧion/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧione eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧioni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧionse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧir/E eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiralo/S eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirami/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiratu/O eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirave/RT eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧire eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiremo/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiren/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧireni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirense eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiresi/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiresiu/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirion/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirioni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirionse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirisen/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiriseni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirisense eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirision/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirisioni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirisionse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirisié/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirisiéu/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirison/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirisoni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirisonse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirié/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiriéu/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirme/G eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiron/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧironi/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧironse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirà/JLNR eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiràe/R eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirè/JL eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirèmi/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiré/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirémoi/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirésimo/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirésimoi/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiréu/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiría/JLNR eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiríami/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiríatu/O eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiríe/JLR eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiríelo/S eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiríemi/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧirò/JL eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiròmi/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisa eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧise/IJLR eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisede eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisege eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisen/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisene eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiseni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisense eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisi/FN eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisiede eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisiege eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧision/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisione eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisioni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisionse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisié/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisiéde/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisiége/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiso/JL eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧison/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisone eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisoni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisonse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧista/I eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiste/I eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisti/I eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisto/I eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧisé/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiséu/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiva/JLPR eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧive/JL eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiven/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiveni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧivense eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧivi/NP eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧivion/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧivioni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧivionse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧivié/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiviéu/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧivo/JL eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧivon/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧivoni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧivonse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧié/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiéde/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiége/P eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧiéu/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧon/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧone eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧoni/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧonse eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧé/F eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéa/JLPR eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéami/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéau/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧée/JL eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéelo/S eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéemi/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéi/NP eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéimo/L eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéimoi/M eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéitu/O eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéndome/G eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéndomene/G eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéo/JL eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧéomi/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧésimo eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧévami/K eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧévau/Q eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧévelo/S eriŧir
SFX A eriŧir ariŧévemi/K eriŧir
