public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
alastar/A
ralegrar/A
amar/A
inanelar/A
arđentar/A
arguir/A
artikolar/A
aselerar/A
dexautorar/A
inaxoƚar/A
bagolar/A
baketar/A
xbalanŧar/A
xbaƚinar/A
rabaltar/A
bandeđar/A
inbaoxar/A
barbajar/A
barlúxer/A
debàter/A
xbatimentar/A
inbauƚar/A
xbaxukiar/A
xbeletar/A
bestemar/A
bevuŧar/A
biasar/A
arbinar/A
inbirir/A
bixegoƚar/A
strabóɉer/A
bokidar/A
inbolponar/A
xbonbardar/A
bordeđar/A
xborsar/A
botonar/A
inbovolar/A
xbragesar/A
inbrandir/A
bravar/A
brilantar/A
inbrojar/A
xbronkolar/A
brustoƚar/A
bulegar/A
inbutirar/A
cakoƚar/A
scauŧar/A
ascèñer/A
océñer/A
cinconar/A
cucar/A
damejar/A
dekorar/A
desimar/A
diramar/A
docar/A
doƚoxar/A
pardonar/A
dormikiar/A
radreŧar/A
prededúxer/A
inđaltronar/A
inđenocar/A
đónxer/A
soradónxer/A
xugolar/A
sperxurar/A
ekuipaɉar/A
rientrar/A
eterniđar/A
exíster/A
stupefar/A
faƚir/A
sfamar/A
desfantar/A
fatuar/A
favoređar/A
onfegar/A
fenir/A
preferir/A
festonar/A
infiankar/A
desfidar/A
desfilar/A
afinar/A
sfioredar/A
fiskalixar/A
sfoderar/A
foƚar/A
forar/A
informaɉar/A
fortexar/A
fradelidar/A
infrànxer/A
desfratar/A
desfredir/A
fríxer/A
sfroñar/A
fugar/A
infumegar/A
refúxer/A
gaƚantejar/A
ingalonar/A
ganbinar/A
garbeƚar/A
xgargarixar/A
ingavetar/A
gloriar/A
gondoƚar/A
ingosar/A
ingranar/A
dexgrankir/A
ingraŧianir/A
ingrexar/A
dexgreŧiar/A
xgriñolir/A
ingrixoƚir/A
ingrotir/A
guaƚivar/A
xguilŧar/A
proibir/A
dixinestar/A
inpedir/A
reintegrar/A
invensionar/A
exíjer/A
dexɉaŧar/A
ɉeƚar/A
reɉetar/A
dexjoŧar/A
ɉubilar/A
skacir/A
rinkagar/A
kalefar/A
kalkolar/A
rekalŧar/A
inkamuŧar/A
rekanbiar/A
skanpaniđar/A
skanseƚar/A
kapitolar/A
skapusar/A
kargar/A
skaroŧar/A
kartiđar/A
inkastelar/A
inkatejar/A
kasar/A
inkavar/A
skaveŧar/A
inklúder/A
kojonbarar/A
inkoƚar/A
skolorir/A
inkomensiar/A
skonéter/A
skonpañar/A
kontentar/A
rekonsar/A
konkórer/A
konkordar/A
inkordeƚar/A
skorporar/A
inkotir/A
kovèrder/A
strakréder/A
inkrikar/A
kroƚar/A
inkroŧolar/A
kuadridar/A
kuèrđer/A
interkuirar/A
kumular/A
kurvar/A
lakonixar/A
languidir/A
lapaŧar/A
stralasar/A
ƚaurear/A
lèxer/A
deƚeguar/A
deletar/A
ƚexenar/A
paralixar/A
ƚimar/A
ƚisar/A
xlofar/A
sprolongar/A
lotar/A
inlunar/A
traƚúxer/A
dexmagrar/A
inmaltar/A
manetar/A
mantegar/A
xmaraŧar/A
inmarmorir/A
masakrar/A
mastruŧar/A
masar/A
maxegar/A
intermedar/A
xmemorar/A
dexmentegar/A
merkantiđar/A
ométer/A
emigrar/A
amirar/A
mòɉer/A
amoƚir/A
amonir/A
morir/A
morbinar/A
dexmorŧar/A
komòver/A
inmufir/A
mustagar/A
muxonar/A
naturalixar/A
xnegridar/A
ninolar/A
noliđar/A
renovar/A
xñanfixar/A
oblegar/A
inoɉar/A
onbrar/A
onđar/A
orbegar/A
orinar/A
ostiar/A
inpacolar/A
strapagar/A
despalar/A
spalesar/A
spalpexar/A
konpanedar/A
spanŧar/A
deskonparir/A
inparentar/A
partesipar/A
trapasar/A
pastiđar/A
inpatinar/A
inspasientar/A
pedotar/A
pelar/A
speƚegar/A
spenasar/A
pendoƚar/A
inpensierir/A
straperdonar/A
spertegar/A
peteđolar/A
spetorar/A
pexar/A
renpiànđer/A
piexar/A
spikoƚir/A
pionbar/A
inpiroƚar/A
pisar/A
pixokar/A
poƚakar/A
inpolverar/A
dispóner/A
sponcar/A
aponteƚar/A
popetar/A
strasportar/A
inpotacar/A
prategar/A
despreŧar/A
inpriar/A
spropiar/A
despuleđar/A
espurgar/A
spusolir/A
rakolar/A
rangar/A
ransinar/A
raxonar/A
recoƚar/A
regolar/A	po:verb
reñar/A
soríder/A
inrisar/A
robakiar/A
abrogar/A
romatixar/A
dexroveɉar/A
ruñar/A
konsakrar/A
saltarar/A
saver/A
sediar/A
seguitar/A
semoƚar/A
serar/A
sialakuar/A
singoƚarixar/A
skaolar/A
iskeletrar/A
skorŧar/A
skuriar/A
solfarar/A
sorbetar/A
sparpajar/A
sospetar/A
spoɉar/A
restabilir/A
konstatar/A
stipular/A
instornir/A
strigar/A
instukar/A
sumar/A
tajar/A
tanbukiar/A
tasar/A
teƚefonar/A
tenporixar/A
inkontèñer/A
sterminar/A
tiranidar/A
tonboƚar/A
retornar/A
intovaɉar/A
trankuiƚar/A
destraviar/A
strikolar/A
retrovar/A
inŧangolar/A
retroŧéder/A
konŧeñar/A
deserveƚar/A
insiganar/A
insipriar/A
insopar/A
uñoƚar/A
prevaƚer/A
varentar/A
veƚar/A	po:verb
xventrar/A
sovèñer/A
inveriar/A
envestir/A
invinar/A
vixiƚar/A
malvoƚer/A
ravòlxer/A
xborñar/A
dexiderar/A
inxoɉelar/A
inŧentrar/A
aportar/A
karateridar/A
bosoƚar/A
inpoɉar/A
rebekolar/A
sfexar/A
stolir/A
kadukar/A
